Mississippi, session 2026, HB413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-11.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, every inhabitant of this state, except persons adjudicated to be non compos mentis, shall be a qualified elector in and for the county, municipality and voting precinct of his or her residence and shall be entitled to vote at any election upon compliance with Section 23-15-563, if he or she is: (a)  * * *who is A citizen of the United States of America * * *,; (b)  Eighteen (18) years old and upwards * * *,; (c)  * * *who has resided A resident in this state for thirty (30) days and for thirty (30) days in the county in which he or she seeks to vote, and for thirty (30) days in the incorporated municipality in which he or she seeks to vote * * *,and; (d)  * * *who has been Duly registered as an elector under Section 23-15-33 * * *, and who has; and (e)  * * * Never * * *been convicted of arson, armed robbery, carjacking, embezzlement, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, murder, rape, statutory rape, or vote fraud * * *or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, shall be a qualified elector in and for the county, municipality and voting precinct of his or her residence, and shall be entitled to vote at any election upon compliance with Section 23‑15‑563. If the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election. (2)  A person who is otherwise a qualified elector under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and has been convicted of bribery, theft, obtaining money or goods under false pretense, perjury, forgery, bigamy, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, except for arson, armed robbery, carjacking, embezzlement, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, murder, rape, or statutory rape, shall have his or her right to vote revoked upon conviction, but shall have his or her right to vote automatically restored after he or she has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of such conviction. (3)  Any person who will be eighteen (18) years of age or older on or before the date of the general election and who is duly registered to vote not less than thirty (30) days before the primary election associated with the general election, may vote in the primary election even though the person has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday at the time that the person seeks to vote at the primary election. (4)  No others than those specified in this section shall be entitled, or shall be allowed, to vote at any election. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-19.  Any person who has been convicted of * * *vote fraud or any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890  * * *such crimes defined as "disenfranchising,", or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, except for arson, armed robbery, carjacking, embezzlement, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, murder, rape, or statutory rape, shall * * *not be registered, or if registered the name of the person shall be  removed from the Statewide Elections Management System by the registrar or the election commissioners of the county of his or her residence have his or her right to vote revoked upon conviction, but shall have his or her right to vote automatically restored once he or she has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of such conviction.  Whenever any person shall be convicted in the circuit court of his or her county of a disenfranchising crime, the county registrar shall * * *thereupon remove his or her name from the Statewide Elections Management System until the person has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of such conviction; and whenever any person shall be convicted of a disenfranchising crime in any other court of any county, the presiding judge of the court shall, on demand, certify the fact in writing to the registrar of the county in which the voter resides, who shall * * *thereupon remove the name of the person from the Statewide Elections Management System until he or she has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of such conviction and retain the certificate as a record of his or her office. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-125.  The pollbook of each voting precinct shall designate the voting precinct for which it is to be used, and shall be ruled in appropriate columns, with printed or written headings, as follows:  date of registration; voter registration number; name of electors; date of birth; and a number of blank columns for the dates of elections.  All qualified applicants who register with the registrar shall be entered in the Statewide Elections Management System.  Only the names of those qualified applicants who register within thirty (30) days before an election shall appear on the pollbooks of the election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  When county election commissioners determine that any elector is disqualified from voting, by reason of death, conviction of a * * *disenfranchising crime disenfranchising crime, removal from the jurisdiction, failure to comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-152, or other legal cause, that fact shall be noted in the Statewide Elections Management System and the voter's name shall be purged from the Statewide Elections Management System, the state's voter roll and the county's pollbooks.  Nothing in this section shall preclude the use of electronic pollbooks.  A person who is otherwise a qualified elector under the provisions of Section 23-15-11 and has been convicted of bribery, theft, obtaining money or goods under false pretense, perjury, forgery, bigamy, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, with the exception of arson, armed robbery, carjacking, embezzlement, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, murder, rape, or statutory rape, shall have his or her right to vote revoked upon conviction, but shall have his or her right to vote automatically restored after he or she has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of such conviction. After the person has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of the conviction, the voter's name shall be automatically restored into the Statewide Elections Management System, the state's voter roll and the county's pollbooks. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-151.  The circuit clerk of each county is authorized and directed to prepare and keep in his or her office a full and complete list, in alphabetical order, of persons convicted of voter fraud or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, whose right to vote has been revoked upon his or her conviction.  A certified copy of any enrollment by one (1) clerk to another will be sufficient authority for the enrollment of the name, or names, in another county.  A list of persons convicted of voter fraud, any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, shall also be entered into the Statewide Elections Management System on a quarterly basis. * * *  Voters who have been convicted in a Mississippi state court of any disenfranchising crime are not qualified electors as defined by Section 23‑15‑11 and shall be purged or otherwise removed by the county registrar or county election commissioners from the Statewide Elections Management System. A person who is otherwise a qualified elector under the provisions of Section 23-15-11 and has been convicted of voter fraud, any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, with the exception of arson, armed robbery, carjacking, embezzlement, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, murder, rape, or statutory rape, shall have his or her right to vote revoked upon conviction, but shall have his or her right to vote automatically restored after he or she has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of the conviction.  After the person has satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of the conviction, the voter's name shall be automatically restored into the Statewide Elections Management System, the state's voter roll and the county's pollbooks. SECTION 5. Section 23-15-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-153.  (1)  At least during the following times, the election commissioners shall meet at the office of the registrar or the office of the election commissioners to carefully revise the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and remove from the roll the names of all voters who have requested to be purged from the voter roll, died, received an adjudication of non compos mentis, been convicted of a disenfranchising crime and had his or her right to vote revoked because of such conviction, failed to comply with the provisions of Section 23-15-152, or otherwise become disqualified as electors for any cause, and shall register the names of all persons who have duly applied to be registered but have been illegally denied registration: (a)  On the Tuesday after the second Monday in January 1987 and every following year; (b)  On the first Tuesday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for members of Congress in the years when members of Congress are elected; (c)  On the first Monday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for state, state district legislative, county and county district offices in the years in which those offices are elected; and (d)  On the second Monday of September preceding the general election or regular special election day in years in which a general election is not conducted. Except for the names of those voters who are duly qualified to vote in the election, no name shall be permitted to remain in the Statewide Elections Management System; however, no name shall be purged from the Statewide Elections Management System based on a change in the residence of an elector except in accordance with procedures provided for by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 and as provided in Section 23-15-152.  Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-573, no person shall vote at any election whose name is not in the county voter roll electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System. (2)  Except as provided in this section, and subject to the following annual limitations, the election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section: (a)  In counties having less than fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than fifty (50) days per year, with no more than fifteen (15) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (b)  In counties having fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than seventy-five (75) days per year, with no more than twenty-five (25) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (c)  In counties having thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred (100) days per year, with no more than thirty-five (35) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year; (d)  In counties having seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred twenty-five (125) days per year, with no more than forty-five (45) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (e)  In counties having ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred fifty (150) days per year, with no more than fifty-five (55) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (f)  In counties having one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred seventy-five (175) days per year, with no more than sixty-five (65) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (g)  In counties having two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred ninety (190) days per year, with no more than seventy-five (75) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year; (h)  In counties having two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred fifteen (215) days per year, with no more than eighty-five (85) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (i)  In counties having two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred thirty (230) days per year, with no more than ninety-five (95) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year; (j)  In counties having two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census or more, not more than two hundred forty (240) days per year, with no more than one hundred five (105) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year. (3)  In addition to the number of days authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the board of supervisors of a county may authorize, in its discretion, the election commissioners to receive a per diem in the amount provided for in subsection (2) of this section, to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section, not to exceed five (5) days. (4)  (a)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed ten (10) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System before any special election.  For purposes of this paragraph, the regular special election day shall not be considered a special election.  The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to this paragraph. (b)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Sixty-five Dollars ($165.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for the performance of their duties on the day of any primary, runoff, general or special election; however, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the election commissioners an additional amount not to exceed Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per election.  The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply to this paragraph. (5)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed fourteen (14) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and in the conduct of a runoff election following either a general or special election. (6)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive only one (1) per diem payment for those days when the election commissioners discharge more than one (1) duty or responsibility on the same day. (7)  The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Ten Dollars ($110.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed five (5) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days for those days when the election commissioners shall be required to conduct an audit of an election as provided in Section 23-15-615. (8)  In preparation for a municipal primary, runoff, general or special election, the county registrar shall generate and distribute the master voter roll and pollbooks from the Statewide Elections Management System for the municipality located within the county.  The municipality shall pay the county registrar for the actual cost of preparing and printing the municipal master voter roll pollbooks.  A municipality may secure "read only" access to the Statewide Elections Management System and print its own pollbooks using this information. (9)  County election commissioners who perform the duties of an executive committee with regard to the conduct of a primary election under a written agreement authorized by law to be entered into with an executive committee shall receive per diem as provided for in subsection (2) of this section.  The days that county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of a primary election shall be treated the same as days county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of other elections. (10)  In addition to any per diem authorized by this section, any election commissioner shall be entitled to the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel on election day. (11)  Every election commissioner shall sign personally a certification setting forth the number of hours actually worked in the performance of the commissioner's official duties and for which the commissioner seeks compensation.  The certification must be on a form as prescribed in this subsection.  The commissioner's signature is, as a matter of law, made under the commissioner's oath of office and under penalties of perjury. The certification form shall be as follows: COUNTY ELECTION COMMISSIONER PER DIEM CLAIM FORM NAME: ____________________________    COUNTY:  _______________ ADDRESS: _________________________    DISTRICT:  _____________ CITY: ______________  ZIP: ________ PURPOSE  APPLICABLE  ACTUAL  PER DIEM DATE    BEGINNING  ENDING OF      MS CODE     HOURS     DAYS WORKED     TIME      TIME    WORK SECTION     WORKED  EARNED ________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ TOTAL NUMBER OF PER DIEM DAYS EARNED EXCLUDING ELECTION DAYS                        ________ PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X $110.00 TOTAL NUMBER PER DIEM DAYS EARNED FOR ELECTION DAYS                              ________ PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED X $165.00 BOARD OF SUPERVISORS ELECTION DAY DISCRETIONARY ADDITION(S) TO PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED      X  $35.00 TOTAL AMOUNT OF PER DIEM CLAIMED $_______ I understand that I am signing this document under my oath as  an election commissioner and under penalties of perjury. I understand that I am requesting payment from taxpayer funds and that I have an obligation to be specific and truthful as to the amount of hours worked and the compensation I am requesting. Signed this the _____ day of ______________, ____. ________________________ Commissioner's Signature When properly completed and signed, the certification must be filed with the clerk of the county board of supervisors before any payment may be made.  The certification will be a public record available for inspection and reproduction immediately upon the oral or written request of any person. Any person may contest the accuracy of the certification in any respect by notifying the chair of the commission, any member of the board of supervisors or the clerk of the board of supervisors of the contest at any time before or after payment is made.  If the contest is made before payment is made, no payment shall be made as to the contested certificate until the contest is finally disposed of.  The person filing the contest shall be entitled to a full hearing, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall issue subpoenas upon request of the contestor compelling the attendance of witnesses and production of documents and things. The contestor shall have the right to appeal de novo to the circuit court of the involved county, which appeal must be perfected within thirty (30) days from a final decision of the commission, the clerk of the board of supervisors or the board of supervisors, as the case may be. Any contestor who successfully contests any certification will be awarded all expenses incident to his or her contest, together with reasonable attorney's fees, which will be awarded upon petition to the chancery court of the involved county upon final disposition of the contest before the election commission, board of supervisors, clerk of the board of supervisors, or, in case of an appeal, final disposition by the court.  The commissioner against whom the contest is decided shall be liable for the payment of the expenses and attorney's fees, and the county shall be jointly and severally liable for same. (12)  Any election commissioner who has not received a certificate issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 23-15-211 indicating that the election commissioner has received the required elections seminar instruction and that the election commissioner is fully qualified to conduct an election, shall not receive any compensation authorized by this section or Section 23-15-239. SECTION 6.  Section 23-15-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-165.  (1)  The Office of the Secretary of State, in cooperation with the county registrars and election commissioners, shall procure, implement and maintain an electronic information processing system and programs capable of maintaining a centralized database of all registered voters in the state.  The system shall encompass software and hardware, at both the state and county level, software development training, conversion and support and maintenance for the system. The Secretary of State shall equip the Statewide Elections Management System with appropriate security measures to protect private information of the registered voter and the integrity of Mississippi elections.  This system shall be known as the "Statewide Elections Management System" and shall constitute the official record of registered voters in every county of the state. (2)  The Office of the Secretary of State shall develop and implement the Statewide Elections Management System so that the registrar and election commissioners of each county shall: (a)  Verify that an applicant that is registering to vote in that county is not registered to vote in another county; (b)  Be notified automatically that a registered voter in its county has registered to vote in another county; (c)  Receive regular reports of death, changes of address and convictions for * * *disenfranchising crimes disenfranchising crimes, which cause a voter to have his or her right to vote revoked, that apply to voters registered in the county; (d)  Receive regular reports of voters who were not convicted of arson, armed robbery, carjacking, embezzlement, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, murder, rape, or statutory rape, and have satisfied all of the sentencing requirements of his or her felony conviction described in paragraph (c) of this subsection and automatically restore the voter's name into the Statewide Elections Management System, the state's voter roll and the county's pollbooks; ( * * *de)  Retain all present functionality related to, but not limited to, the use of voter roll data and to implement such other functionality as the law requires to enhance the maintenance of accurate county voter records and related jury selection and redistricting programs; and ( * * *ef)  When evidence exists that a registered voter may not be a citizen of the United States as provided in Section 23-15-15, send notification to the registrar of the location where the person is registered to vote. (3)  As a part of the procurement and implementation of the system, the Office of the Secretary of State shall, with the assistance of the advisory committee, procure services necessary to convert current voter registration records in the counties into a standard, industry accepted file format that can be used on the Statewide Elections Management System.  Thereafter, all official voter information shall be maintained on the Statewide Elections Management System.  The standard industry accepted format of data  was reviewed and approved by a majority of the advisory committee created in subsection (5) of this section after consultation with the Circuit Clerks Association and the format may not be changed without consulting the Circuit Clerks Association. (4)  The Secretary of State may, with the assistance of the advisory committee, adopt rules and regulations necessary to administer the Statewide Elections Management System.  The rules and regulations shall at least: (a)  Provide for the establishment and maintenance of a centralized database for all voter registration information in the state; (b)  Provide procedures for integrating data into the centralized database; (c)  Provide security to ensure that only the registrar, or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, can add information to, delete information from and modify information in the system; (d)  Provide the registrar or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, access to the system at all times, including the ability to download copies of the industry standard file, for all purposes related to their official duties, including, but not limited to, exclusive access for the purpose of printing all local pollbooks; (e)  Provide security and protection of all information in the system and monitor the system to ensure that unauthorized access is not allowed; (f)  Provide a procedure that will allow the registrar, or his or her designee or other appropriate official, as the law may require, to identify the precinct to which a voter should be assigned; and (g)  Provide a procedure for phasing in or converting existing manual and computerized voter registration systems in counties to the Statewide Elections Management System. (5)  The Secretary of State established an advisory committee to assist in developing system specifications, procurement, implementation and maintenance of the Statewide Elections Management System.  The committee included two (2) representatives from the Circuit Clerks Association, appointed by the association; two (2) representatives from the Election Commissioners Association of Mississippi, appointed by the association; one (1) member of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, or its staff, appointed by the association; the Director of the Stennis Institute of Government at Mississippi State University, or his or her designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services, or his or her designee; two (2) persons knowledgeable about elections and information technology appointed by the Secretary of State; and the Secretary of State, who shall serve as the chair of the advisory committee. (6)  (a)  Social security numbers, telephone numbers, email addresses, and date of birth and age information in statewide, district, county and municipal voter registration files shall be exempt from and shall not be subject to inspection, examination, copying or reproduction under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. (b)  Copies of statewide, district, county or municipal voter registration files, excluding social security numbers, telephone numbers, email addresses, and date of birth and age information, shall be provided to any person in accordance with the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of production. SECTION 7.  Section 97-39-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-39-3.  If any person shall fight a duel, or give or accept a challenge to fight a duel, or knowingly carry or deliver such challenge or the acceptance thereof, or be second to either party to any duel, whether such act be done in the state or out of it, or who shall go out of the state to fight a duel, or to assist in the same as second, or to send, accept, or carry a challenge, shall be disqualified from holding any office, be disenfranchised, and incapable of holding or being elected to any post of honor, profit or emolument, civil or military, under the constitution and laws of this state; and the appointment of any such person to office, as also all votes given to any such person, are illegal, and none of the votes given to such person for any office shall be taken or counted. SECTION 8.  Section 99-19-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 99-19-37.  (1)  Any person who has lost the right of suffrage by reason of conviction of crime and has not been pardoned therefrom, who thereafter served honorably in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States during the periods of World War I or World War II as hereinafter defined and shall have received an honorable discharge, or release therefrom, shall by reason of such honorable service, have the full right of suffrage restored, provided, however, this does not apply to any one having an unfinished or suspended sentence. (2)  For the purposes of this section the period of World War I shall be from April 6, 1917 to December 1, 1918, and the period of World War II shall be from December 7, 1941 to December 31, 1946. (3)  In order to have restored, and to exercise, the right of franchise under the provisions of this section a person affected hereby shall have his discharge, or release, from the Armed Forces of the United States recorded in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which such person desires to exercise the right of franchise and if such discharge, or release, appears to be an honorable discharge, or release, and shows such person to have served honorably during either of the periods stated in subsection (2) of this section such person shall have the full right of suffrage restored as though an act had been passed by the Legislature in accordance with Section 253 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi restoring the right of suffrage to such person. SECTION 9.  Section 99-19-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-71.  (1)  Any person, who is a United States citizen, who has been convicted of a misdemeanor that is not a traffic violation, and who is a first offender, may petition the justice, county, circuit or municipal court in which the conviction was had for an order to expunge any such conviction from all public records. For an expunction as provided in this subsection (1), the petitioner shall give ten (10) days' written notice to the district attorney before any hearing on the petition.  In all cases, the court wherein the petition is filed may grant the petition if the court determines, on the record or in writing, that the applicant is rehabilitated from the offense which is the subject of the petition.  In those cases where the court denies the petition, the findings of the court in this respect shall be identified specifically and not generally. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person, who is a United States citizen, who has been convicted of a felony and who has paid all criminal fines and costs of court imposed in the sentence of conviction * * *may petition shall automatically have his or her record of such conviction expunged from the court in which the conviction was had * * *for an order to expunge one (1) conviction, and from all public records, five (5) years after the successful completion of all terms and conditions of the sentence for the conviction * * *upon a hearing as determined in the discretion of the court; however, a person is not eligible to expunge a felony classified as: (i)  A crime of violence as provided in Section 97-3-2; (ii)  Arson, first degree as provided in Sections 97-17-1 and 97-17-3; (iii)  Trafficking in controlled substances as provided in Section 41-29-139; (iv)  A third, fourth or subsequent offense DUI as provided in Section 63-11-30(2)(c) and (2)(d); (v)  Felon in possession of a firearm as provided in Section 97-37-5; (vi)  Failure to register as a sex offender as provided in Section 45-33-33; (vii)  Voyeurism as provided in Section 97-29-61; (viii)  Witness intimidation as provided in Section 97-9-113; (ix)  Abuse, neglect or exploitation of a vulnerable person as provided in Section 43-47-19; or (x)  Embezzlement, as provided in Sections 97-11-25 and 97-23-19, if the value and/or amount involved is Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more. (b)  For purposes of this act, the term "automatically" means initiated by the court in which the conviction was had, and without requiring a petition by the person who was convicted. (c)  A person is eligible for only one (1) felony expunction under this paragraph.  For the purposes of this section, the terms "one (1) conviction" and "one (1) felony expunction" mean and include all convictions that arose from a common nucleus of operative facts as determined in the discretion of the court. * * *(b)  The petitioner shall give ten (10) days' written notice to the district attorney before any hearing on the petition.  In all cases, the court wherein the petition is filed may grant the petition if the court determines, on the record or in writing, that the applicant is rehabilitated from the offense which is the subject of the petition.  In those cases where the court denies the petition, the findings of the court in this respect shall be identified specifically and not generally. (3)  Upon entering an order of expunction under this section, a nonpublic record thereof shall be retained by the Mississippi Criminal Information Center solely for the purpose of determining whether, in subsequent proceedings, the person is a first offender.  The order of expunction shall not preclude a district attorney's office from retaining a nonpublic record thereof for law enforcement purposes only.  The existence of an order of expunction shall not preclude an employer from asking a prospective employee if the employee has had an order of expunction entered on his or her behalf.  The effect of the expunction order shall be to restore the person, in the contemplation of the law, to the status he or she occupied before any arrest or indictment for which convicted.  No person as to whom an expunction order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any provision of law to be guilty of perjury or to have otherwise given a false statement by reason of his or her failure to recite or acknowledge such arrest, indictment or conviction in response to any inquiry made of him or her for any purpose other than the purpose of determining, in any subsequent proceedings under this section, whether the person is a first offender.  A person as to whom an order has been entered, upon request, shall be required to advise the court, in camera, of the previous conviction and expunction in any legal proceeding wherein the person has been called as a prospective juror.  The court shall thereafter and before the selection of the jury advise the attorneys representing the parties of the previous conviction and expunction. (4)  Upon petition therefor, a justice, county, circuit or municipal court shall expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped or there was no disposition of such case, or the person was found not guilty at trial. (5)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section, no public official is eligible for expunction under this section for any conviction related to his or her official duties. (6)  Upon the entering of an order of expunction under this section, the circuit clerk shall forward a certified copy of such order to the Mississippi Criminal Information Center at the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.  Within forty-five (45) days of receiving a certified copy of an order of expunction as provided in this section, the department shall remove such individual's criminal history record information, conviction information, and disposition form from the Mississippi central criminal database which is comprised of prior offenses and convictions. SECTION 10.  Section 45-27-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-27-7.  (1)  The Mississippi Justice Information Center shall: (a)  Develop, operate and maintain an information system which will support the collection, storage, retrieval and dissemination of all data described in this chapter, consistent with those principles of scope, security and responsiveness prescribed by this chapter. (b)  Cooperate with all criminal justice agencies within the state in providing those forms, procedures, standards and related training assistance necessary for the uniform operation of the statewide center. (c)  Offer assistance and, when practicable, instruction to all local law enforcement agencies in establishing efficient local records systems. (d)  Make available, upon request, to all local and state criminal justice agencies, to all federal criminal justice agencies and to criminal justice agencies in other states any information in the files of the center which will aid such agencies in the performance of their official duties.  For this purpose the center shall operate on a twenty-four-hour basis, seven (7) days a week.  Such information, when authorized by the director of the center, may also be made available to any other agency of this state or any political subdivision thereof and to any federal agency, upon assurance by the agency concerned that the information is to be used for official purposes only in the prevention or detection of crime or the apprehension of criminal offenders. (e)  Cooperate with other agencies of this state, the crime information agencies of other states, and the national crime information center systems of the Federal Bureau of Investigation in developing and conducting an interstate, national and international system of criminal identification and records. (f)  Make available, upon request, to nongovernmental entities or employers certain information for noncriminal justice purposes as specified in Section 45-27-12. (g)  Institute necessary measures in the design, implementation and continued operation of the justice information system to ensure the privacy and security of the system. Such measures shall include establishing complete control over use of and access to the system and restricting its integral resources and facilities and those either possessed or procured and controlled by criminal justice agencies.  Such security measures must meet standards developed by the center as well as those set by the nationally operated systems for interstate sharing of information. (h)  Provide data processing for files listing motor vehicle drivers' license numbers, motor vehicle registration numbers, wanted and stolen motor vehicles, outstanding warrants, identifiable stolen property and such other files as may be of general assistance to law enforcement agencies; provided, however, that the purchase, lease, rental or acquisition in any manner of "computer equipment or services," as defined in Section 25-53-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be subject to the approval of the Mississippi Information Technology Services. (i)  Maintain a field coordination and support unit which shall have all the power conferred by law upon any peace officer of this state. (j)  Within forty-five (45) days after receipt by the department of a certified copy of an order of expunction as provided in Section 99-19-71, remove an individual's criminal history record information, conviction information, and disposition form from the Mississippi central criminal database which is comprised of prior offenses and convictions. (2)  The department, including the investigative division or the center, may: (a)  Obtain and store fingerprints, descriptions, photographs and any other pertinent identifying data from crime scenes and on persons who: (i)  Have been or are hereafter arrested or taken into custody in this state: 1.  For an offense which is a felony; 2.  For an offense which is a misdemeanor; 3.  As a fugitive from justice; or (ii)  Are or become habitual offenders; or (iii)  Are currently or become confined to any prison, penitentiary or other penal institution; or (iv)  Are unidentified human corpses found in the state; or (v)  Have submitted fingerprints for conducting criminal history record checks. (b)  Compare all fingerprint and other identifying data received with that already on file and determine whether or not a criminal record is found for such person, and at once inform the requesting agency or arresting officer of those facts that may be disseminated consistent with applicable security and privacy laws and regulations.  A record shall be maintained for a minimum of one (1) year of the dissemination of each individual criminal history, including at least the date and recipient of such information. (c)  Establish procedures to respond to those individuals who file requests to review their own records, pursuant to Sections 45-27-11 and 45-27-12, and to cooperate in the correction of the central center records and those of contributing agencies when their accuracy has been successfully challenged either through the related contributing agencies or by court order issued on behalf of an individual. (d)  Retain in the system the fingerprints of all law enforcement officers and part-time law enforcement officers, as those terms are defined in Section 45-6-3, any fingerprints sent by the Mississippi State Department of Health, and of all applicants to law enforcement agencies. (3)  There shall be a presumption that a copy of any document submitted to the center in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-27-9 that has been processed as set forth in this chapter and subsequently certified and provided by the center to a law enforcement agency or a court shall be admissible in any proceeding without further authentication unless a person objecting to that admissibility has successfully challenged the document under the provisions of Section 45-27-11. SECTION 11.  Section 45-27-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-27-21. (1) (a)  A certified copy of every expunction and nonadjudication order shall be sent by the circuit clerk to the Mississippi Criminal Information Center where it shall be maintained in a separate confidential database accessible only upon written request by a district attorney, a county prosecuting attorney, a municipal court prosecuting attorney, the Attorney General of Mississippi and the Mississippi Law Enforcement Standards and Training Board. (b)  Within forty-five (45) days of receiving a certified copy of an order of expunction as provided in Section 99-19-71, the department shall remove such individual's criminal history record information, conviction information, and disposition form from the Mississippi central criminal database which is comprised of prior offenses and convictions. (2)  Any criminal conviction which has been expunged or nonadjudicated may be used for the purpose of determining habitual offender status and for the use of the Mississippi Law Enforcement Standards and Training Board in giving or retaining law enforcement certification, and to ensure that a person is only eligible for first-offender status one (1) time. SECTION 12.  Section 45-34-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-34-3.  (1)  The department shall post a publicly accessible registry online of all offenders by July 1, 2024. (2)  (a)  The list must include the offender's full legal name, any aliases by which the offender is or has been known, including any online or internet identifiers and the offender's date of birth. (b)  The list shall not include the offender's social security number, driver's license number, any other state or federal identification number, physical address or telephone numbers. (3)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, no offender shall be removed from the registry unless and until all fines, penalties and restitution resulting from conviction have been paid and proof of same provided to the department. (b)  If the offender is not convicted of another registrable offense while listed and if all fines, penalties and restitution have been paid, the department shall remove the offender's information from the list after either five (5) years from the date of the offender's conviction or five (5) years from the date of an offender's release from physical incarceration, whichever is later. (c)  Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a person who has served any sentence imposed and paid all fines, penalties and any restitution ordered may petition the department to be removed from the list after the satisfaction of the conditions of this paragraph (c).  Upon receipt and confirmation of a true and correct petition, the department shall remove the offender from the registry. (d)  Within forty-five (45) days of receiving a certified copy of an order of expunction as provided in Section 99-19-71, the department shall remove such individual from the registry, and remove his or her criminal history record information, conviction information, and disposition form from the Mississippi central criminal database which is comprised of prior offenses and convictions. SECTION 13.  Section 97-37-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-37-5.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for any person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United States to possess any firearm or any bowie knife, dirk knife, butcher knife, switchblade knife, metallic knuckles, blackjack, or any muffler or silencer for any firearm unless such person has received a pardon for such felony, has received an order of expunction for such conviction as provided under Section 99-19-71, has received a relief from disability pursuant to Section 925(c) of Title 18 of the United States Code, or has received a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (2)  Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or committed to the custody of the State Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than ten (10) years, or both. (3)  A person who has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, under the laws of another state, under federal law or in state military court may apply for a certificate of rehabilitation as provided in this section.  If the person was convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, he or she may apply to the court in which he was convicted for a certificate of rehabilitation.  If the person was convicted of a felony under the laws of another state, under federal law or in state military court, he or she may apply to the court in the person's county of residence for a certificate of rehabilitation.  A person convicted of a felony under the laws of another state, under federal law or  in state military court shall attach a certified copy of his or her judgment and a certified copy of his or her completion of sentence to the petition for a certificate of rehabilitation.  The court may grant such certificate in its discretion upon a showing to the satisfaction of the court that the applicant has been rehabilitated and has led a useful, productive and law-abiding life since the completion of his or her sentence and upon the finding of the court that he or she will not be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety. (4)  (a)  A person who is discharged from court-ordered mental health treatment may petition the court which entered the commitment order for an order stating that the person qualifies for relief from a firearms disability. (b)  In determining whether to grant relief, the court must hear and consider evidence about: (i)  The circumstances that led to imposition of the firearms disability under 18 USCS, Section 922(d)(4); (ii)  The person's mental history; (iii)  The person's criminal history; and (iv)  The person's reputation. (c)  A court may not grant relief unless it makes and enters in the record the following affirmative findings: (i)  That the person is no longer likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety; and (ii)  Removing the person's disability to purchase a firearm is not against the public interest. SECTION 14.  Section 45-1-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-1-45.  (1)  The Department of Public Safety shall implement an Internet-based data and information sharing network that will allow state and local law enforcement, court personnel, prosecutors and other agencies to exchange and view felony and misdemeanor information on current and former criminal offenders through a currently available, near real-time, updated hourly, nationwide jail database which represents fifty percent (50%) or more of all incarcerated persons in the country. (2)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Information Exchange Network Fund.  The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the Web-based information sharing network required by subsection (1) of this section.  Monies from the funds derived from assessments under Section 99-19-73 shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Public Safety.  The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of: (a)  Monies appropriated by the Legislature; (b)  The interest accruing to the fund; (c)  Monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73; (d)  Monies received from the federal government; (e)  Donations; and (f)  Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law. SECTION 15.  Section 45-27-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-27-9.  (1)  All criminal justice agencies within the state shall submit to the center an arrest card that will transmit fingerprints, descriptions, photographs (when specifically requested), and other identifying data on persons who have been lawfully arrested or taken into custody in this state for all felonies and misdemeanors as described in Section 45-27-7(2)(a).  It shall be the duty of all chiefs of police, sheriffs, district attorneys, courts, court clerks, judges, parole and probation officers, wardens or other persons in charge of correctional institutions in this state to furnish the center with all data required by the rules duly promulgated under the Administrative Procedures Act to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter, and the duty of courts and court clerks to submit a disposition form for every disposition.  It shall be the duty of all criminal justice agencies within the state to supply the prosecutor and the proper court with the disposition form that is attached to the physical arrest card if fingerprints were taken manually or, if fingerprints were captured digitally, the disposition form generated by the electronic fingerprint device at the time of the arrest.  The PEER committee may conduct random review of the records of any agency or clerks referenced in this subsection (1) to determine whether the duties of such agencies and clerks are being fulfilled in a timely manner.  The PEER committee, based on its findings, if any, shall recommend measures to ensure that the duties are more effectively carried out in a timely manner. (2)  (a)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall obtain, or cause to be obtained, fingerprints according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, full face and profile photographs (if equipment is available) and other available identifying data, of each person arrested or taken into custody for an offense of a type designated in subsection (1) of this section, of all persons arrested or taken into custody as fugitives from justice and of all unidentified human corpses in their jurisdictions, but photographs need not be taken if it is known that photographs of the type listed, taken within the previous year, are on file. Any record taken in connection with any person arrested or taken into custody and subsequently released without charge or cleared of the offense through court proceedings shall be purged from the files of the center and destroyed upon receipt by the center of a lawful expunction order.  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrests or takings into custody which result in release without charge or subsequent exoneration from criminal liability within twenty-four (24) hours of the release or exoneration. (b)  The center will work to secure grant funds to purchase live scan equipment to be utilized throughout the state.  All law enforcement agencies shall utilize any live scan equipment provided by the center to ensure the most accurate collection of fingerprints.  The center shall coordinate the use of the equipment with federal, state, county and municipal law enforcement agencies. (3)  Fingerprints and other identifying data required to be taken under subsection (2) shall be forwarded within twenty-four (24) hours after taking for filing and classification, but the period of twenty-four (24) hours may be extended to cover any intervening holiday or weekend.  Photographs taken shall be forwarded at the discretion of the agency concerned, but, if not forwarded, the fingerprint record shall be marked "Photo Available" and the photographs shall be forwarded subsequently if the center so requests. (4)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies shall submit to the center detailed descriptions of arrest warrants and related identifying data immediately upon determination of the fact that the warrant cannot be served for the reasons stated.  If the warrant is subsequently served or withdrawn, the law enforcement agency concerned must immediately notify the center of the service or withdrawal. Also, the agency concerned must annually, no later than January 31 of each year and at other times if requested by the center, confirm all arrest warrants which continue to be outstanding.  Upon receipt of a lawful expunction order, the center shall purge and destroy files of all data relating to an offense when an individual is subsequently exonerated from criminal liability of that offense.  The center shall not be liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge any records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action. (5)  All persons in charge of state correctional institutions shall obtain fingerprints, according to the fingerprint system of identification established by the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation or as otherwise directed by the center, and full face and profile photographs of all persons received on commitment to the institutions.  The prints so taken shall be forwarded to the center, together with any other identifying data requested, within ten (10) days after the arrival at the institution of the person committed.  At the time of release, the institution will again obtain fingerprints, as before, and forward them to the center within ten (10) days, along with any other related information requested by the center.  The institution shall notify the center immediately upon the release of the person. (6)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies, all court clerks, all municipal justices where they have no clerks, all justice court judges and all persons in charge of state and county probation and parole offices, shall supply the center with the information described in subsections (4) and (10) of this section on the basis of the forms and instructions for the disposition form to be supplied by the center. (7)  All persons in charge of law enforcement agencies in this state shall furnish the center with any other identifying data required in accordance with guidelines established by the center.  All law enforcement agencies and correctional institutions in this state having criminal identification files shall cooperate in providing the center with copies of the items in the files which will aid in establishing the nucleus of the state criminal identification file. (8)  All law enforcement agencies within the state shall report to the center, in a manner prescribed by the center, all persons wanted by and all vehicles and identifiable property stolen from their jurisdictions.  The report shall be made as soon as is practical after the investigating department or agency either ascertains that a vehicle or identifiable property has been stolen or obtains a warrant for an individual's arrest or determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the individual has committed a crime.  The report shall be made within a reasonable time period following the reporting department's or agency's determination that it has grounds to believe that a vehicle or property was stolen or that the wanted person should be arrested. (9)  All law enforcement agencies in the state shall immediately notify the center if at any time after making a report as required by subsection (8) of this section it is determined by the reporting department or agency that a person is no longer wanted or that a vehicle or property stolen has been recovered.  Furthermore, if the agency making the apprehension or recovery is not the one which made the original report, then it shall immediately notify the originating agency of the full particulars relating to the apprehension or recovery using methods prescribed by the center. (10)  All law enforcement agencies in the state and clerks of the various courts shall promptly report to the center all instances where records of convictions of criminals are ordered expunged by courts of this state as now provided by law.  The center shall promptly expunge from the files of the center and destroy all records pertaining to any convictions that are ordered expunged by the courts of this state as provided by law. (11)  The center shall not be held liable for the failure to purge, destroy or expunge records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering the action. (12)  Any criminal justice department or agency making an expenditure in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year on software or programming upgrades concerning a computerized records management system or jail management system shall ensure that the new or upgraded system is formatted to Department of Justice approved XML format and that no impediments to data sharing with other agencies or departments exist in the software programming. (13)  (a)  All law enforcement agencies within the state shall: (i)  Implement an incident-based reporting system within the agency or department that meets the reporting requirements of the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation; (ii)  Use the system described by subparagraph (i) to submit to the center information and statistics concerning criminal offenses committed in the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency, in a manner prescribed by the center; and (iii)  Report the information as soon as is practicable after the investigating agency or department ascertains that a qualifying crime has been committed in its jurisdiction, once the state-level NIBRS Repository is available. (b)  No later than December 31, 2025, state and local law enforcement agencies shall be compliant with all regulations promulgated by the Department of Public Safety's Criminal Information Center (CIC), with consultation with the President of the Sheriffs Association and Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police with regard to the National Incident-Based Reporting System (NIBRS) of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. SECTION 16.  Section 45-27-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-27-11.  The center shall make a person's criminal records available for inspection by him or his attorney upon written request.  Prior to inspection, the person must submit a set of fingerprints, sign a written authorization for the records check, and provide any other identifying information required by the center.  Should such person or his attorney contest the accuracy of any portion of such records, the center shall make available to such person or his attorney a copy of the contested record upon written application identifying the portion of the record contested and showing the reason for the contest of accuracy.  Forms, procedures, fees, identification and other related aspects pertinent to such access may be prescribed by the center in making access available. If an individual believes such information to be inaccurate or incomplete, he may request the original agency having custody or control of the records to purge, modify or supplement them and to so notify the center of such changes.  Should the agency decline to so act or should the individual believe the agency's decision to be otherwise unsatisfactory, the individual or his attorney may within thirty (30) days of such decision enter an appeal to the county or circuit court of the county of his residence or to such court in the county where such agency exists.  The court in each such case shall conduct a de novo hearing and may order such relief as it finds to be required by law.  Such appeals shall be entered in the same manner as other appeals are entered. Should the record in question be found to be inaccurate or incomplete, the court shall order it to be appropriately expunged, modified or supplemented by an explanatory notation.  Each agency or individual in the state with custody, possession or control of any such record shall promptly cause each and every copy thereof in his custody, possession or control to be altered in accordance with the court's order.  Notification of each such deletion, amendment and supplementary notation shall be promptly disseminated to any individuals or agencies to which the records in question have been communicated as well as to the individual whose records have been ordered so altered.  The center shall not be held liable for the failure to modify, supplement, destroy or expunge records if an agency or court fails to forward to the center proper documentation ordering such action. Agencies, including the center, at which criminal offender records are sought to be inspected may prescribe reasonable hours and places of inspection and may impose such additional procedures, fees or restrictions, including fingerprinting, as are reasonably necessary both to assure the record's security, to verify the identities of those who seek to inspect them and to maintain an orderly and efficient mechanism for such access. SECTION 17.  Section 45-34-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-34-5.  (1)  The department shall maintain the registry on the Internet, which shall contain a disclaimer informing the public that: (a)  The information contained on the website is obtained from public records, and the department does not guarantee the website's accuracy or completeness; (b)  The list only includes persons convicted in Mississippi state courts of a limited list of crimes.  Persons who are convicted in any federal court, or who are convicted of a crime other than a registrable offense will not appear on the registry. (2)  The department and any individual or entity acting at the request or upon the direction of the department are immune from civil liability for damages arising from reporting information under this chapter and will be presumed to have acted in good faith in performing its duties under this chapter. SECTION 18.  If any section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase or any part of any act passed hereafter is declared to be unconstitutional or void, or if for any reason is declared to be invalid or of no effect, the remaining sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases or parts thereof shall be in no manner affected thereby but shall remain in full force and effect. Unless the contrary intent shall clearly appear in the particular act in question, each and every act passed hereafter shall be read and construed as though the provisions of the first paragraph of this section form an integral part thereof, whether expressly set out therein or not. SECTION 19.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.